Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 23
EDUCATION REGARDING USE OF NONMOTORIZED
WHEELED TRANSPORTATION BY MINORS

42-4-2301. Comprehensive education.

The department of transportation, in collaboration with the departments of education and public safety and appropriate nonprofit organizations and advocacy groups, shall notify schools of the availability of and make available to schools existing educational curriculum for individuals under eighteen years of age regarding the safe use of public streets and premises open to the public by users of nonmotorized wheeled transportation and pedestrians. The curriculum shall focus on, at a minimum, instruction regarding:

The safe use of bicycles;

High risk traffic situations;

Bicycle and traffic handling skills;

On-bike training;

Proper use of bicycle helmets;

Traffic laws and regulations;

The use of hiking and bicycling trails; and

Safe pedestrian practices.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire part added, (HB 10-1147), ch. 422, p. 2186, § 3, effective July 1.